Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 3

Subsidized Receiving Homes

37-2-301. Authority to provide.

Counties, through their county legislative bodies, are authorized and empowered to set up subsidized receiving homes for the care of dependent, neglected or abandoned children, or children without proper parental care or guardianship, whenever an order is made by proper resolution duly adopted by a majority of the members constituting the legislative body and placed on the minutes of the legislative body.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.1 (Williams, § 4765.119); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-601.

Cross-References. Family violence shelters and child abuse prevention services, title 71, ch. 6, part 2.

Collateral References.

Liability of parent for support of child institutionalized by juvenile court. 59 A.L.R.3d 636.

37-2-302. Appropriations and tax levy for subsidizing homes.

County legislative bodies are authorized and empowered to appropriate from funds on hand not otherwise appropriated, such sums as the legislative body may deem necessary to subsidize such homes and to furnish board and care for children committed to such homes as provided in §37-2-314; or the legislative bodies may levy a tax on property to meet such appropriations. These sums shall be paid by warrant drawn on the county treasury when proper invoice or bill has been audited and approved by the county mayor or the county mayor's designated agent.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.2 (Williams, § 4765.120); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-602; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-2-303. State's contribution to cost of subsidizing homes.

The state of Tennessee, through the department of human services, shall set up a grant in aid fund in the support of every licensed receiving home in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the cost of subsidizing the home and fifty percent (50%) of the boarding care and special needs of any child placed in the home as provided in §37-2-314.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.3 (Williams, § 4765.121); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-603.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

37-2-304. Rules and regulations of department of human services.

The department of human services is empowered and directed to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations for the conduct of all such receiving homes as shall be necessary to effect the purpose of this part and other laws of the state relating to children and safeguard the well being of all children kept therein.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.13 (Williams, § 4765.131); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-604.

37-2-305. Inspection and license by department of human services required.

No home in any county shall be approved as a county receiving home until it has been inspected and licensed by the department of human services, and such license shall not be issued for a period longer than one (1) year.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.6 (Williams, § 4765.124); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-605.

37-2-306. Licensed home requirements — Approval by health and fire prevention departments.

No such license shall be issued unless the premises are in a fit sanitary condition, and the home is equipped and staffed to provide properly for the physical, social, moral, mental, educational and religious needs of all children kept therein. The application for such license shall have been approved by the department of health and the fire prevention division of the department of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.7 (Williams, § 4765.125); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-606.

37-2-307. Contents of license — Limitation on number of children.

The license shall state the name of the licensee, the particular premises in which the business may be carried on, and the number of children, not to exceed eight (8), that may be properly boarded or cared for therein at any one time.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.8 (Williams, § 4765.126); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-607.

37-2-308. Record of license kept by department of human services and county mayor.

A record of the license so issued shall be kept by the department of human services and by the county mayor of the county in which the home is located.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.9 (Williams, § 4765.127); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-608; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-2-309. License must be maintained on premises.

Such license shall be kept and maintained upon the premises at all times and exhibited upon request of any member of the general public or representative of the state, county or municipal government.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.12 (Williams, § 4765.130); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-609.

37-2-310. Revocation of license.

Any license issued under this part may be revoked by the department of human services acting through the commissioner. The department shall notify the licensee thirty (30) days prior to revoking any license stating the reasons for revocation. A copy of the notice shall be sent to the county mayor of the county in which the home is located. Thirty (30) days after the issuance of the notice the department, by its agent, shall visit the home and, if the reasons set out in the notice for revoking the license have been corrected, the license shall not be revoked; but if the reasons set out in the notice have not been corrected, the license may be revoked by the department acting through the commissioner after an opportunity for a fair hearing before the commissioner or the commissioner's duly designated representative, the juvenile judge and the county attorney.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.15 (Williams, § 4765.133); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-610; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-2-311. License necessary to receive child or subsidy therefor.

No person shall receive a child for care in any such home or receive any payment for subsidy or for board or special needs of any child unless it has an unrevoked license issued by the department of human services within twelve (12) months preceding the payment of such subsidy or the placement of such child.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.10 (Williams, § 4765.128); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-611.

37-2-312. Contract with licensed receiving homes — Terms.

The county mayor and the department of human services, through its designated agent, shall enter into a written contract with each licensed receiving home, the contract to state the amount of subsidy to be paid for each bed, the number of beds to be available at all times, and the monthly, weekly and daily amount to be paid for the board of each child placed in the home, and such special needs and the amounts of each that may be provided for each child placed in the home.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.4 (Williams, § 4765.122); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-612; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-2-313. Quarterly reports made by county to department of human services.

Each county maintaining a subsidized receiving home shall submit to the department of human services by the tenth of each month or the first of each quarter, that is, January, April, July, and October, respectively, an itemized statement of the cost of subsidizing each licensed receiving home, and an itemized statement of the boarding care and special needs provided each child placed in the home during the preceding month or quarter. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of the statement, the department shall reimburse the county in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the statement, so long as the cost of the subsidy, boarding care and special needs of any one (1) child does not exceed the amount specified in the contract entered into by the county, the department and the receiving home.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.5 (Williams, § 4765.123); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-613.

37-2-314. Commitment of children to homes.

Any dependent, neglected or abandoned child or any child without proper parental care or guardianship shall be received in the home by commitment of the juvenile judge wherever the juvenile judge's jurisdiction permits, upon a judgment or decree entered in the court showing that the child is dependent, neglected or abandoned or without proper parental care or guardianship, or is likely to become a public charge.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.16 (Williams, § 4765.134); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-614.

37-2-315. Period of commitment.

The period of commitment to the home shall be for such time as may be fixed by the juvenile judge, in the order of commitment, pending social study and planning for the best interest of each child committed, but of not longer than the majority of the child.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.17 (Williams, § 4765.135); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-615.

37-2-316. Case record kept on each child.

The county office of the department of human services shall prepare a case record on each child committed under the provisions of this part and shall furnish the juvenile judge with a summary of the record, who shall preserve the record in a well-bound book.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.18 (Williams, § 4765.136); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-616.

37-2-317. Investigation by department of human services.

The department of human services, by its agents, has the power to enter, visit and investigate any licensed receiving home at any and all reasonable times without prior notice of its intentions so to do.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.14 (Williams, § 4765.132); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-617.

37-2-318. Exceeding number of children authorized prohibited — Keeping children in place not designated in license prohibited.

No greater number of children shall be kept at any one time on the licensed premises than is authorized by the license, and no child shall be kept in a building or place not designated in the license.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.11 (Williams, § 4765.129); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-618.

Cross-References. Limitation on number of children in each home, §37-2-307.

37-2-319. Violation of part — False statements or reports — Penalty.

Any person who violates this part or the regulations promulgated by the department of human services by direction of this part or who willfully makes any false statements or reports to the department or the county mayor, or both, of any county with reference to any matter embraced by this part commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1949, ch. 222, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 4746.19 (Williams, § 4765.137); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 37-619; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.